es: Tipo de pedal compatible: Crank Brothers; Jaula plana; Look Keo; Plataforma; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Pista; Universal; Otro
hu: Kompatibilis pedáltípus: Crank Brothers; Lapos keretes; Look Keo; Platform; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Pálya; Univerzális; Egyéb
el: Συμβατός τύπος πεντάλ: Crank Brothers; Επίπεδο (flat cage); Look Keo; Πλατφόρμα; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Πίστας; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
bg-BG: Съвместим тип педал: Crank Brothers; С клетка (Flat cage); Look Keo; Платформени; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Писта; Универсални; Друго
it: Tipo di pedale compatibile: Crank Brothers; Flat con gabbia; Look Keo; Flat; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Pista; Universale; Altro
vi: Loại bàn đạp tương thích: Crank Brothers; Bàn đạp phẳng lồng; Look Keo; Bàn đạp phẳng (Platform); SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Track; Phổ thông; Khác
da: Kompatibel pedaltype: Crank Brothers; Flat cage; Look Keo; Platform; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Bane; Universel; Andet
ru: Совместимый тип педали: Crank Brothers; Платформенные с рамкой; Look Keo; Платформенные; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Трековые; Универсальные; Другое
fr: Type de pédale compatible: Crank Brothers; Plate; Look Keo; Plateforme; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Piste; Universel; Autre
sv: Kompatibel pedaltyp: Crank Brothers; Korgpedal; Look Keo; Plattform; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Bana; Universell; Övrigt
zh-TW: 相容踏板類型: Crank Brothers; 平踏板/框架踏板; Look Keo; 平台踏板; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; 場地車踏板; 通用; 其他
nl: Compatibel type pedaal: Crank Brothers; Flat cage; Look Keo; Platform; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Baan; Universeel; Overig
pt-BR: Tupo de pedal compatível: Crank Brothers; Gaiola; Look Keo; Plataforma; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Pista; Universal; Outro
ko: 호환 페달 유형: 크랭크 브라더스; 플랫 케이지; 룩 케오; 플랫폼; SPD; SPD-SL; 스피드플레이; 타임; 트랙; 범용; 기타
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ pedálu: Crank Brothers; Ploché s ohrádkou; Look Keo; Platformové; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Dráhové; Univerzálne; Iné
pl: Zgodny typ pedału: Crank Brothers; Płaska platforma; Look Keo; Platformowe; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Torowe; Uniwersalne; Inne
zh-CN: 适用脚踏类型: Crank Brothers; 笼式平踏; Look Keo; 平踏; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; 场地脚踏; 通用; 其他
ja: 対応ペダルタイプ: クランクブラザーズ; フラットケージ; Look Keo; プラットフォーム; SPD; SPD-SL; スピードプレイ; Time; トラック; ユニバーサル; その他
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta pedale: Crank Brothers; Ravni s kavezom; Look Keo; Platforma; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Track (za stazu); Univerzalno; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de pedal compatível: Crank Brothers; Gaiola plana; Look Keo; Plataforma; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Pista; Universal; Outro
en: Compatible pedal type: Crank Brothers; Flat cage; Look Keo; Platform; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Track; Universal; Other
th: ประเภทแป้นเหยียบที่เข้ากันได้: Crank Brothers; บันไดจักรยานแบบเรียบ; Look Keo; แบบแพลตฟอร์ม; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; ลู่; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta pedala: Crank Brothers; Ploska kletka; Look Keo; Platforma; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Track; Univerzalno; Drugo
tr: Uyumlu pedal tipi: Crank Brothers; Düz kafes; Look Keo; Platform; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Pist; Evrensel; Diğer
de: Kompatibler Pedaltyp: Crankbrothers; Käfigpedal; Look Keo; Plattform; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Bahnrad; Universal; Sonstige
lt-LT: Suderinamo tipo pedalas: Crank Brothers; Plokščias rėmelis; Look Keo; Platforminiai; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Treko; Universalūs; Kita
cs: Kompatibilní typ pedálu: Crank Brothers; Ploché (s ohrádkou); Look Keo; Platformové; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Dráhové; Univerzální; Jiné
fi: Yhteensopiva poljintyyppi: Crank Brothers; Häkkipoljin; Look Keo; Avopoljin; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Rata; Yleinen; Muu
nb: Kompatibel pedaltype: Crank Brothers; Flat cage; Look Keo; Plattform; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Bane; Universell; Annet
ro-RO: Tip de pedală compatibil: Crank Brothers; Platformă cu ramă; Look Keo; Platformă; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time; Pistă; Universal; Altele